Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1554.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-925, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-925. Practice of chiropractic; limitations A. A doctor of chiropractic is a portal of entry health care provider who engages in the practice of health care that includes: 1. The diagnosis and correction of subluxations, functional vertebral or articular dysarthrosis or neuromuscular skeletal disorders for restoring and maintaining health. 2. Physical and clinical examinations, diagnostic x-rays, imaging, and clinical diagnostic laboratory procedures that are limited to nasal swabs, oral swabs, sputum collection, urine collection, finger pricks or venipuncture in order to determine the propriety of a regimen of chiropractic care or to form a basis for referring patients to other licensed health care professionals, or both. 3. Treatment by: (a) Physical medicine modalities, therapeutic procedures and adjustment of the spine or bodily articulations. (b) Procedures related to the correction of subluxations and neuromuscular skeletal disorders. (c) Prescription of orthopedic supports. (d) Acupuncture. B. A doctor of chiropractic who is licensed under this chapter shall not prescribe or administer medicine or drugs, perform surgery or practice obstetrics. END_STATUTE